District of Columbia statutes.
4-107

Institutional personnel under supervision of Board; duties of superintendent; appointment and discharge of personnel.

The superintendents and all other employees engaged in the operation of the institutions enumerated in § 4-106 shall be subject to the supervision of the Board. Each superintendent shall have the management and control of the institution to which he is appointed and shall be subordinate to the Director of Public Welfare. The superintendent and all other employees of each of the institutions enumerated in § 4-106 shall be appointed by the Mayor of the District of Columbia upon nomination by the Board and shall be subject to discharge by the Mayor upon recommendation of the Board.

Mar. 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 209, ch. 58, § 7
Superintendents of prisons, see § 24-201.11 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 3-107.
1973 Ed., § 3-107.
Board of Public Welfare abolished: See note to § 4-102.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.